Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-709
Nebraska Juvenile Code; index.

On or before October 1, 2024, the Revisor of Statutes shall prepare and publish a simplified index to the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The index shall be arranged alphabetically by common topics faced by children and families involved in proceedings under the code. The index shall be made available to the public on the Legislature's website. The Revisor shall update the index annually to reflect changes in the law.

Laws 2024, LB1051, § 18.

Nebraska Juvenile Code, see section 43-2,129.